Texas, session 892, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 556.0055(a), Government Code, is amended to read as follows: (a)  A political subdivision or private entity that receives state funds may not use public [the] funds to pay: (1)  lobbying expenses incurred by the recipient of the state funds; (2)  a person or entity that is required to register with the Texas Ethics Commission under Chapter 305; (3)  any partner, employee, employer, relative, contractor, consultant, or related entity of a person or entity described by Subdivision (2); or (4)  a person or entity that has been hired to represent associations or other entities for the purpose of affecting the outcome of legislation, agency rules, ordinances, or other government policies. SECTION 2.  Section 556.0055, Government Code, as amended by this Act, applies to an expenditure made on or after the effective date of this Act.  An expenditure made before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this Act, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.